it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Racquetball e squash > Ausili per l'allenamento di racquetball e squash: Macchine lancia palle per racquetball e squash; Attrezzatura fitness per squash e racquetball; Miglioratori della presa per squash e squash; Pareti per allenamenti di racquetball e squash; Nastri protettivi e protezioni per racquetball e squash; Pesi per racchette da racquetball e squash; Reti da rimbalzo per racquetball e squash; Attrezzi per allenamento swing per racquetball e squash; Bersagli di racquetball e squash; Zaini da allenamento per racquetball e squash; Borse da allenamento per racquetball e squash; Occhiali da allenamento per racquetball e squash
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Squash e raquetebol > Auxiliares de treino para raquetebol e squash: Máquinas de bolas de raquetebol e squash; Equipamento de fitness para raquetebol e squash; Reforços de aderência para raquetebol e squash; Paredes de treino para raquetebol e squash; Fitas e proteções de raquetebol e squash; Pesos para raquetes de raquetebol e squash; Rebotes para squash e raquetebol; Simuladores de swing de raquetebol e squash; Artigos de treino de alvo para raquetebol e squash; Mochilas de treino para raquetebol e squash; Sacos de treino para raquetebol e squash; Óculos de treino para raquetebol e squash
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Ракетбол и сквош > Тренировочный инвентарь для ракетбола и сквоша: Пушки для мячей для ракетбола и сквоша; Инвентарь для фитнес-тренировок для ракетбола и сквоша; Средства для улучшения хвата ракетки для ракетбола и сквоша; Тренировочные стенки для ракетбола и сквоша; Защитные ленты и накладки для ракетбола и сквоша; Утяжелители для ракеток для ракетбола и сквоша; Тренировочные сетки для ракетбола и сквоша; Тренажеры для отработки ударов в ракетболе и сквоше; Мишени для тренировок по ракетболу и сквошу; Рюкзаки для тренировок по ракетболу и сквошу; Сумки для тренировок по ракетболу и сквошу; Очки для тренировок по ракетболу и сквошу
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Raketbal a squash > Raketbalové a squashové tréningové pomôcky: Stroje na raketbal a squash; Fitness vybavenie na raketbal a squash; Koncovky rakiet pre raketbal a squash; Tréningové steny na raketbal a squash; Ochranné pásky a chrániče na raketbal a squash; Závažia na raketbalové a squashové rakety; Raketbalové a squashové odrazové steny; Raketbalové a squashové trenažéry na švih; Raketbalové a squashové trenažéry na terč; Tréningové batohy na raketbal a squash; Tréningové tašky na raketbal a squash; Tréningové okuliare na raketbal a squash
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Racquetball ve Squash > Racquetball ve Squash Eğitim Araçları: Raketbol ve squash top atma makineleri; Racquetball ve Squash Fitness Ekipmanları; Racquetball ve Squash Tutuş Arttırıcılar; Racquetball ve Squash Antrenman Duvarları; Raketbol ve squash koruyucu bantları ve bariyerleri; Raketbol ve squash raketi ağırlıkları; Racquetball ve Squash Ribaundçuları; Raketbol ve squash vuruş antrenman aletleri; Racquetball ve Squash Hedef Çalıştırıcıları; Racquetball ve Squash Antrenman Sırt Çantaları; Racquetball ve Squash Antrenman Çantaları; Racquetball ve Squash Antrenman Gözlüğü
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Racquetball en squash > Squash- en racquetballtrainingshulpmiddelen: Ballenmachines voor racquetball en squash; Squash- en racquetballfitnessapparaten; Squash- en racquetballgripversterkers; Squash- en racquetballoefenmuren; Beschermtape en -strips voor racquetball en squash; Racquetball- en squashracketgewichten; Squash- en racquetballrebounders; Swingtrainers voor racquetball en squash; Squash- en racquetballdoelwittrainers; Squash- en racquetballtrainingsrugzakken; Squash- en racquetballtrainingszakken; Squash- en racquetballtrainingsbrillen
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Raketbolas ir skvošas > Raketbolo ir skvošo treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės: Raketbolo ir skvošo kamuoliukų treniruokliai; Raketbolo ir skvošo sportinė įranga; Raketbolo ir skvošo sukibimą gerinančio priemonės; Raketbolo ir skvošo treniruočių sienelės; Apsauginės raketbolo ir skvošo juostos bei apsaugos; Raketbolo ir skvošo rakečių svareliai; Raketbolo ir skvošo atmušikliai; Raketbolo ir skvošo smūgių treniruokliai; Raketbolo ir skvošo treniruočių taikiniai; Raketbolo ir skvošo treniruočių kuprinės; Raketbolo ir skvošo treniruočių krepšiai; Raketbolo ir skvošo treniruočių akiniai
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng quần > Dụng cụ hỗ trợ luyện tập Racquetball & Squash: Máy bắn bóng Racquetball & bóng quần; Thiết bị tập thể dục Racquetball & Squash; Dụng cụ tăng cường độ bám chơi Racquetball & Squash; Tường luyện tập Racquetball & Squash; Băng dính & đồ bảo vệ Racquetball & bóng quần; Tạ gắn vợt Racquetball & bóng quần; Lưới bật lại tập Racquetball & Squash; Dụng cụ tập vung vợt Racquetball & bóng quần; Tấm bia mục tiêu tập Racquetball & Squash; Ba lô đựng đồ luyện tập Racquetball & Squash; Túi đựng đồ luyện tập Racquetball & Squash; Kính an toàn luyện tập Racquetball & Squash
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > แร็กเกตบอลและสควอช > อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกซ้อมแร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช: เครื่องยิงลูกแร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช; อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายแร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช; อุปกรณ์เพิ่มประสิทธิภาพการจับในแร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช; กำแพงฝึกซ้อมแร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช; เทปและอุปกรณ์ป้องกันสำหรับแร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช; ตัวถ่วงน้ำหนักไม้แร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช; กระดานเด้งลูกแร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช; อุปกรณ์ฝึกวงสวิงแร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช; ตัวช่วยฝึกเล็งเป้าในแร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช; เป้สะพายหลังสำหรับฝึกซ้อมแร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช; กระเป๋าฝึกซ้อมแร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช; แว่นตาฝึกซ้อมแร็กเก็ตบอลและสควอช
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 短柄牆球/壁球 > 短柄牆球和壁球訓練輔助工具: 短柄牆球與壁球發球機; 短柄牆球和壁球健身器材; 短柄牆球和壁球握力增強器; 短柄牆球和壁球練習牆; 短柄牆球與壁球保護貼與護具; 短柄牆球與壁球拍配重; 短柄牆球壁球和壁球練習網; 短柄牆球與壁球揮拍訓練器; 短柄牆球和壁球練習靶; 短柄牆球和壁球訓練背包; 短柄牆球和壁球訓練包; 短柄牆球和壁球訓練護目鏡
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Racquetball și squash > Articole antrenament de racquetball și squash: Mașini de mingi pentru racquetball și squash; Echipamente de fitness pentru racquetball și squash; Articole priză pentru racquetball și squash; Pereți de antrenament pentru racquetball și squash; Bandă de protecție și apărători pentru racquetball și squash; Greutăți pentru rachete de racquetball și squash; Elemente ricoșeu pentru racquetball și squash; Dispozitive de antrenament pentru lovitură la racquetball și squash; Ținte pentru racquetball și squash; Rucsacuri de antrenament pentru racquetball și squash; Saci antrenament pentru racquetball și squash; Ochelari pentru antrenament pentru racquetball și squash
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Raketbal a squash > Tréninkové pomůcky na squash a raketbal: Nahrávací stroje pro racquetball a squash; Fitness vybavení pro raketbal a squash; Přípravky a pomůcky pro zlepšení gripu na squash a raketbal; Cvičné stěny pro raketbal a squash; Ochranné pásky a kryty pro racquetball a squash; Závaží na rakety na racquetball a squash; Odrážecí trenažéry na trénink raketbalu a squashe; Trenažéry švihu pro racquetball a squash; Pomůcky pro trénování přesnosti úderů na squash a raketbal; Tréninkové batohy na squash a raketbal; Tréninkové tašky na squash a raketbal; Tréninkové brýle na raketbal a squash
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Reketbol i skvoš > Pomagala za trening za reketbol i skvoš: Sprave za lopte za reketbol i skvoš; Fitness oprema za reketbol i skvoš; Sredstva za bolje prianjanje za reketbol i skvoš; Zidovi za vježbanje za reketbol i skvoš; Zaštitne trake i štitnici za reketbol i skvoš; Utezi za rekete za reketbol i skvoš; Odbijajuća mreža za reketbol i skvoš; Trenažeri za zamah za reketbol i skvoš; Trenažeri s metom za reketbol i skvoš; Ruksaci za trening za reketbol i skvoš; Torbe za trening za reketbol i skvoš; Naočale za trening za reketbol i skvoš
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Racketboll och squash > Träningshjälpmedel för racketboll och squash: Bollmaskiner för racquetball och squash; Fitnessutrustning för racketboll och squash; Greppförbättrare för racketboll och squash; Träningsväggar för racketboll och squash; Skyddstejp och skydd för racquetball och squash; Racketvikter för racquetball och squash; Returnerare för racketboll och squash; Svingtränare för racquetball och squash; Måltränare för racketboll och squash; Träningsryggsäckar för racketboll och squash; Träningsväskor för racketboll och squash; Träningsglasögon för racketboll och squash
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 短网拍墙球/壁球 > 墙球/壁球训练辅助用品: 墙球与壁球发球机; 墙球/壁球健身器材; 墙球/壁球握力增强器; 墙球/壁球练习墙; 墙球与壁球防护胶带与护具; 墙球与壁球拍配重; 墙球/壁球反弹器; 墙球与壁球挥拍训练器; 墙球/壁球目标训练器; 墙球/壁球训练背包; 墙球/壁球训练包; 墙球/壁球训练护目镜
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Racquetball & Squash > Racquetball- & Squash-Trainingshilfen: Ballmaschinen für Racquetball & Squash; Racquetball- & Squash-Fitnessgeräte; Racquetball- & Squash-Griffverstärker; Racquetball- & Squash-Übungswände; Schutzbänder & Schoner für Racquetball & Squash; Gewichte für Racquetball- & Squashschläger; Racquetball- & Squash-Rebounder; Schwungtrainer für Racquetball & Squash; Racquetball- & Squash-Zieltrainer; Racquetball- & Squash-Trainingsrucksäcke; Racquetball- & Squash-Trainingstaschen; Racquetball- & Squash-Schutzbrillen
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Raquetebol e squash > Auxiliares de treinamento de raquetebol e squash: Máquinas lançadoras de bolas de raquetebol e squash; Equipamento de fitness para raquetebol e squash; Melhoradores de aderência para raquetebol e squash; Paredes para treino de raquetebol e squash; Fitas de proteção e protetores para raquetebol e squash; Pesos para raquetes de raquetebol e squash; Rebotes de raquetebol e squash; Equipamentos de treinamento de swing para raquetebol e squash; Treinadores de alvo para raquetebol e squash; Mochilas para treino de raquetebol e squash; Bolsas de treinamento para raquetebol e squash; Óculos de treino para raquetebol e squash
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Racquetball og squash > Racquetball og squash – træningshjælpemidler: Boldmaskiner til racquetball og squash; Racquetball og squash – fitnessudstyr; Racquetball og squash – grebtrænere; Racquetball og squash – træningsvægge; Beskyttelsestape og skærme til racquetball og squash; Ketchervægte til racquetball og squash; Racquetball og squash – rebounders; Svingtrænere til racquetball og squash; Racquetball og squash – mål; Racquetball og squash – rygsække; Racquetball og squash – tasker; Racquetball og squash – briller
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Racquetball ja squash > Racquetball- ja squash-harjoitteluvälineet: Racquetball- ja squash-pallokoneet; Racquetball- ja squash-kuntolaitteet; Racquetball- ja squash-otteen harjoittelulaitteet; Racquetball- ja squash-harjoitteluseinät; Racquetball- ja squash-mailojen suojateipit; Racquetball- ja squash-mailojen painot; Racquetball- ja squash-palautusseinät; Racquetballin ja squashin lyöntiharjoitteluvälineet; Racquetball- ja squash-maalitaulut; Racquetball- ja squash-harjoittelureput; Racquetball- ja squash-harjoittelusäkit; Racquetball- ja squash-harjoittelulasit
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Ρακέτα και σκουός > Βοηθήματα προπόνησης ρακέτας & σκουός: Μηχανήματα εκτόξευσης μπάλας ράκετμπολ και σκουός; Εξοπλισμός γυμναστικής ρακέτας & σκουός; Ενισχυτές λαβής ρακέτας & σκουός; Τοίχοι εξάσκησης ρακέτας & σκουός; Προστατευτικές ταινίες και προστατευτικά ράκετμπολ και σκουός; Βαρίδια ρακετών ράκετμπολ και σκουός; Συσκευές αναπήδησης για ρακέτες & σκουός; Εξοπλισμός προπόνησης αιώρησης ράκετμπολ και σκουός; Στόχοι προπόνησης ρακέτας & σκουός; Σακίδια προπόνησης ρακέτας & σκουός; Τσάντες προπόνησης ρακέτας & σκουός; Γυαλιά προπόνησης ρακέτας & σκουός
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Racquetball & Squash > Racquetball & Squash Training Aids: Racquetball & Squash Ball Machines; Racquetball & Squash Fitness Equipment; Racquetball & Squash Grip Enhancers; Racquetball & Squash Practice Walls; Racquetball & Squash Protective Tape & Guards; Racquetball & Squash Racket Weights; Racquetball & Squash Rebounders; Racquetball & Squash Swing Trainers; Racquetball & Squash Target Trainers; Racquetball & Squash Training Backpacks; Racquetball & Squash Training Bags; Racquetball & Squash Training Goggles
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Ráquetbol y squash > Ayudas para el entrenamiento de ráquetbol y squash: Máquinas lanzapelotas de racquetball y squash; Equipos de fitness para ráquetbol y squash; Potenciadores de agarre de ráquetbol y squash; Paredes de práctica de ráquetbol y squash; Cintas y protectores para racquetball y squash; Pesas para raquetas de racquetball y squash; Rebotadores de ráquetbol y squash; Entrenadores de swing de racquetball y squash; Entrenadores de objetivo de ráquetbol y squash; Mochilas de entrenamiento de ráquetbol y squash; Bolsas de entrenamiento de ráquetbol y squash; Gafas de entrenamiento de ráquetbol y squash
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Racquetball et squash > Aides à l’entraînement au racquetball et au squash: Lance-balles de squash et de racquetball; Équipement de fitness pour racquetball et squash; Renforceurs d’adhérence pour racquetball et squash; Murs d’entraînement de racquetball et de squash; Bandes et protections pour raquettes de squash et racquetball; Poids de raquette de squash et de racquetball; Tapis de rebond de racquetball et de squash; Appareils d’entraînement au swing pour squash et racquetball; Entraînement au ciblage de racquetball et de squash; Sacs à dos d’entraînement de racquetball et de squash; Sacs d’entraînement pour racquetball et squash; Lunettes d’entraînement de racquetball et de squash
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Racquetball in skvoš > Pripomočki za vadbo racquetballa in skvoša: Racquetball in skvoš Stroji za žoge; Fitnes oprema za racquetball in skvoš; Pripomočki za boljši oprijem za racquetball in skvoš; Vadbene stene ZA racquetball in skvoš; Zaščitni trakovi in ščitniki za racquetball in skvoš; Uteži za loparje za racquetball in skvoš; Naprave za odbijanje žoge za racquetball in skvoš; Racquetball in skvoš Vadbeni pripomočki za zamahe; Naprave za vadbo ciljanja za racquetball in skvoš; Nahrbtniki za vadbo racquetballa in skvoša; Športne torbe za racquetball in skvoš; Očala za vadbo racquetballa in skvoša
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > スカッシュ・ラケットボール > スカッシュ・ラケットボール練習器具: ラケットボール・スカッシュ用ボールマシン; スカッシュ・ラケットボール用フィットネス器具; スカッシュ・ラケットボール用グリップエンハンサー; スカッシュ・ラケットボール用練習用壁; ラケットボール・スカッシュ用保護テープ・ガード; ラケットボール・スカッシュ用ラケットウェイト; スカッシュ・ラケットボール用リバウンダー; ラケットボール・スカッシュ用スイングトレーナー; スカッシュ・ラケットボール用ターゲットトレーナー; スカッシュ・ラケットボール用トレーニングバックパック; スカッシュ・ラケットボール用トレーニングバッグ; スカッシュ・ラケットボール用トレーニングゴーグル
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Racquetball og squash > Treningshjelpemidler for racquetball og squash: Ballmaskiner for racquetball og squash; Treningsutstyr for racquetball og squash; Grepstrenere for racquetball og squash; Treningsvegger for racquetball og squash; Beskyttelsesteip og -beskyttere for racquetball og squash; Racketvekter for racquetball og squash; Reboundere for racquetball og squash; Svingtrenere for racquetball og squash; Måltrenere for racquetball og squash; Treningsryggsekker for racquetball og squash; Treningssekker for racquetball og squash; Treningsbriller for racquetball og squash
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Raketball és squash > Raketball és squash edzési segédeszközök: Racquetball- és squashlabda-adogató gépek; Raketball és squash fitneszfelszerelés; Raketball és squash markolatfokozók; Raketball és squash gyakorlófalak; Racquetball és squash védőszalagok és védők; Racquetball- és squashütő-súlyok; Raketball és squash visszapattanók; Racquetball és squash lendítésgyakorlók; Raketball és squash célpontedzők; Raketball és squash edzőhátizsákok; Raketball és squash edzőtáskák; Raketball és squash edzőszemüvegek
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Ракетбол и скуош > Помощни средства за ракетбол и скуош: Машини за изстрелване на топки за ракетбол и тенис; Фитнес оборудване за ракетбол и скуош; Продукти за подобряване на захвата за ракетбол и скуош; Стени за тренировки по ракетбол и скуош; Защитни ленти и предпазители за ракетбол и скуош; Тежести за ракети за скуош и ракетбол; Мрежи за рикошет за ракетбол и скуош; Тренажори за замах за ракебол и скуош; Мишени за тренировка за ракетбол и скуош; Раници за тренировки по ракетбол и скуош; Чанти за тренировки по ракетбол и скуош; Очила за тренировка по ракетбол и скуош
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 라켓볼/스쿼시 > 라켓볼/스쿼시 훈련 장비: 라켓볼 및 스쿼시 볼 머신; 라켓볼/스쿼시 피트니스 장비; 라켓볼/스쿼시 그립 개선 용품; 라켓볼/스쿼시 연습벽; 라켓볼 및 스쿼시 보호 테이프 및 가드; 라켓볼 및 스쿼시 라켓 웨이트; 라켓볼/스쿼시 리바운더; 라켓볼 및 스쿼시 스윙 훈련기; 라켓볼/스쿼시 타겟 트레이너; 라켓볼/스쿼시 트레이닝 배낭; 라켓볼/스쿼시 트레이닝 가방; 라켓볼/스쿼시 트레이닝 고글
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Racquetball i squash > Pomoce treningowe do racquetballa i squasha: Maszyny do wyrzucania piłek do racquetballa i squasha; Sprzęt fitness do racquetballa i squasha; Wzmacniacze chwytu do racquetballa i squasha; Ściany treningowe do racquetballa i squasha; Taśmy ochronne i owijki do racquetballa i squasha; Ciężarki do rakiet do racquetballa i squasha; Odbijacze do racquetballa i squasha; Trenażery zamachu do racquetballa i squasha; Trenażery celowania do racquetballa i squasha; Plecaki treningowe do racquetballa i squasha; Torby treningowe do racquetballa i squasha; Gogle treningowe do racquetballa i squasha